testing/myv-tests-noun.yaml
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетнескак
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетневгак
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: псакастонтьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавантьседеяк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсекскак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсеськак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсентькак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьседентькак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсевантькак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетнескак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетневгак
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: псакавантьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьседеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсекскак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсеськак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсентькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьседентькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсевантькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнескак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетневгак
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонтьсетненеккак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьседеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьседеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсеськак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсентеньгак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьседентькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсесэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсестэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсевантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсевтементькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсешкантькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсексэнтькак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетненьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнененьгак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнедеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнесэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнестэяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнескак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетневаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнекскак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетневгак
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетневтемеяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетнешкаяк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com+Clt/Гак: псакашкантьсетненеккак
